Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 5 of this  2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 404.095
to 404.270.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Immediate family” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.730.
(2) “Private search party” means any person that:
(a) Participates or offers to participate in an effort to locate a missing person;
(b) Intends to charge a fee, request  donations or profit from a production in connection
with such efforts;
(c) Is not acting as an agent of,  at the request of, or pursuant to an agreement with a
public body or federal governmental body; and
(d) Is not a qualified search and rescue volunteer as defined in ORS 404.200.
(3) “Production” means a  photograph, motion picture, video recording or audio recording.
(4) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
SECTION 3.
(1) A private search party, before  engaging in efforts to locate a missing
person, shall disclose to an immediate family member of the missing person, verbally and  in
writing:
(a) That the private search party is not acting in connection  with a governmental body;
and
(b) The nature of the private search party’s involvement in the effort to  locate the
missing person.
(2) A  private search party shall notify an immediate family member of the missing per-
son, verbally and in writing, if the private search party:
(a) Intends to charge a fee for the private search party’s services or assistance;
(b) Intends to request donations for the private search party’s services or  assistance; or
(c) Intends to derive profit from any production  made in connection with the private
search party’s services or assistance.
SECTION 4.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of  this section, at least 72 hours
before engaging in efforts to locate a missing person, a private search party shall notify  the
sheriff of the county in which the efforts will take place.
(2) A notification under this section must include the following information:
(a) The name, residence address and contact information for the private search party;
Enrolled House Bill 2668 (HB 2668-A) Page 1
(b) The date of birth of the private search party;
(c) Whether the private search  party holds certifications related to search and rescue,
emergency operations or medicine;
(d) The identity of the missing person;
(e) Whether the private search party intends to use dogs in the search effort;
(f) The anticipated time frame for the search efforts; and
(g) Which  of the notifications described in section 3 (2) of this 2025 Act the private search
party is required to make, if any, and whether the private search party has  made such no-
tifications.
(3) Notifications to sheriffs under this section must be made  by telephone, in writing or
through any Internet-based portal created for the purpose of making such notifications.
(4) The law enforcement agency of any public body may authorize private  search parties
to begin search efforts before the 72-hour period described in subsection  (1) of this section
has elapsed.
SECTION 5.
A county may adopt an  ordinance or resolution that imposes civil penalties
for failure to comply with the provisions of sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2668 (HB 2668-A) Page 2